Florida, session 2026, SB438.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âPresent subsections (39) through (91) of section 21 39.01, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (40) 22 through (92), respectively, a new subsection (39) is added to 23 that section, and subsection (10) and present subsection (39) of 24 that section are amended, to read: 25 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 26 context otherwise requires: 27 (10)ââCaregiverâ means the parent, legal custodian, 28 permanent guardian, adult household member, or other person 29 responsible for a childâs welfare as defined in subsection (58) 30 (57). 31 (39)ââIncapacitatedâ means a person determined by a 32 licensed physician or other qualified professional to be unable 33 to care for his or her child because of mental, physical, or 34 other incapacity that prevents him or her from making informed 35 decisions regarding the childâs welfare, including, but not 36 limited to, the childâs health and safety. 37 (40)(39)ââInstitutional child abuse or neglectâ means 38 situations of known or suspected child abuse or neglect in which 39 the person allegedly perpetrating the child abuse or neglect is 40 an employee of a public or private school, public or private day 41 care center, residential home, institution, facility, or agency 42 or any other person at such institution responsible for the 43 childâs welfare as defined in subsection (58) (57). 44 Section 2.âSubsection (2), paragraph (a) of subsection (3), 45 and subsection (5) of section 39.0139, Florida Statutes, are 46 amended to read: 47 39.0139âVisitation or other contact; restrictions.â 48 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT.â 49 (a)âThe Legislature finds that: 50 1.âFor some children who are abused, abandoned, or 51 neglected by a parent or other caregiver, abuse may include 52 sexual abuse, parricide, or attempted parricide. 53 2.âThese same children are at risk of suffering from 54 further harm during visitation or other contact. 55 3.âVisitation or other contact with the child may be used 56 to influence the childâs testimony. 57 (b)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to protect children 58 and reduce the risk of further harm to children who have been 59 sexually abused or exploited by a parent or other caregiver, or 60 whose parent or legal custodian has been killed or incapacitated 61 by a parent or other caregiver, by placing additional 62 requirements on judicial determinations related to contact 63 between a parent or caregiver who meets the criteria under 64 paragraph (3)(a) and a child victim in any proceeding pursuant 65 to this chapter. 66 (3)âPRESUMPTION OF DETRIMENT.â 67 (a)âA rebuttable presumption of detriment to a child is 68 created when: 69 1.âA court of competent jurisdiction has found probable 70 cause exists that a parent or caregiver has sexually abused a 71 child as defined in s. 39.01; 72 2.âA parent or caregiver has been found guilty of, 73 regardless of adjudication, or has entered a plea of guilty or 74 nolo contendere to, charges under the following statutes or 75 substantially similar statutes of other jurisdictions: 76 a.âSection 787.04, relating to removing minors from the 77 state or concealing minors contrary to court order; 78 b.âSection 794.011, relating to sexual battery; 79 c.âSection 798.02, relating to lewd and lascivious 80 behavior; 81 d.âChapter 800, relating to lewdness and indecent exposure; 82 e.âSection 826.04, relating to incest; or 83 f.âChapter 827, relating to the abuse of children; or 84 3.âA court of competent jurisdiction has determined a 85 parent or caregiver to be a sexual predator as defined in s. 86 775.21 or a parent or caregiver has received a substantially 87 similar designation under laws of another jurisdiction. 88 4.âA parent or caregiver is arrested for an offense under 89 s. 782.04 or s. 782.07 when the victim of the offense is the 90 childâs other parent or legal custodian. 91 5.âA parent or caregiver is arrested for an offense under 92 ss. 782.04 and 777.04, relating to attempted murder; ss. 782.051 93 and 777.04, relating to attempted felony murder; or ss. 782.07 94 and 777.04, relating to attempted manslaughter, when the victim 95 of the offense is the childâs other parent or legal custodian 96 and the offense has rendered the victim incapacitated. 97 (5)âCONDITIONS.âAny visitation or other contact ordered 98 under paragraph (4)(d) must shall be: 99 (a)âSupervised by a person who has previously received 100 special training in the dynamics of child sexual abuse or 101 parricide, as applicable; or 102 (b)âConducted in a supervised visitation program, provided 103 that the program has an agreement with the court and a current 104 affidavit of compliance on file with the chief judge of the 105 circuit in which the program is located affirming that the 106 program has agreed to comply with the minimum standards 107 contained in the administrative order issued by the Chief 108 Justice of the Supreme Court on November 17, 1999, and provided 109 the program has a written agreement with the court and with the 110 department as described in s. 753.05 containing policies and 111 guidelines specifically related to referrals involving child 112 sexual abuse. 113 Section 3.âPresent subsections (3) through (18) of section 114 39.402, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) 115 through (19), respectively, a new subsection (3) is added to 116 that section, paragraph (e) is added to present subsection (11) 117 of that section, and paragraph (b) of present subsection (6) of 118 that section is amended, to read: 119 39.402âPlacement in a shelter.â 120 (3)âA shelter hearing must take place within 24 hours after 121 a child is taken into custody if: 122 (a)âThe childâs parent or legal custodian has been arrested 123 for an offense under s. 782.04 or s. 782.07 when the victim of 124 the offense is the childâs other parent or legal custodian; or 125 (b)âThe childâs parent or legal custodian has been arrested 126 for an offense under ss. 782.04 and 777.04, relating to 127 attempted murder; ss. 782.051 and 777.04, relating to attempted 128 felony murder; or ss. 782.07 and 777.04, relating to attempted 129 manslaughter, when the victim of the offense is the childâs 130 other parent or legal custodian and the offense has rendered the 131 victim incapacitated. 132 (6) 133 (b)âThe shelter petition filed with the court must address 134 each condition required to be determined by the court in 135 paragraphs (9)(a), (b), (d), and (h) (8)(a), (b), (d), and (h). 136 (12)(11) 137 (e)âIf a child is placed in a shelter pursuant to a court 138 order following a shelter hearing under subsection (3), the 139 child must be referred to a provider of trauma-informed 140 therapeutic services, which may be: 141 1.âA licensed private provider selected by the childâs 142 legal custodian or guardian ad litem; or 143 2.âA state-funded program administered by the department or 144 a contracted community-based care provider through a child 145 victim advocacy program. 146 Section 4.âSubsection (1) of section 39.302, Florida 147 Statutes, is amended to read: 148 39.302âProtective investigations of institutional child 149 abuse, abandonment, or neglect.â 150 (1)âThe department shall conduct a child protective 151 investigation of each report of institutional child abuse, 152 abandonment, or neglect. Upon receipt of a report that alleges 153 that an employee or agent of the department, or any other entity 154 or person covered by s. 39.01(40) or (58) s. 39.01(39) or (57), 155 acting in an official capacity, has committed an act of child 156 abuse, abandonment, or neglect, the department shall initiate a 157 child protective investigation within the timeframe established 158 under s. 39.101(2) and notify the appropriate state attorney, 159 law enforcement agency, and licensing agency, which shall 160 immediately conduct a joint investigation, unless independent 161 investigations are more feasible. When conducting investigations 162 or having face-to-face interviews with the child, investigation 163 visits shall be unannounced unless it is determined by the 164 department or its agent that unannounced visits threaten the 165 safety of the child. If a facility is exempt from licensing, the 166 department shall inform the owner or operator of the facility of 167 the report. Each agency conducting a joint investigation is 168 entitled to full access to the information gathered by the 169 department in the course of the investigation. A protective 170 investigation must include an interview with the childâs parent 171 or legal guardian. The department shall make a full written 172 report to the state attorney within 3 business days after making 173 the oral report. A criminal investigation shall be coordinated, 174 whenever possible, with the child protective investigation of 175 the department. Any interested person who has information 176 regarding the offenses described in this subsection may forward 177 a statement to the state attorney as to whether prosecution is 178 warranted and appropriate. Within 15 days after the completion 179 of the investigation, the state attorney shall report the 180 findings to the department and shall include in the report a 181 determination of whether or not prosecution is justified and 182 appropriate in view of the circumstances of the specific case. 183 Section 5.âParagraph (p) of subsection (4) of section 184 394.495, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 185 394.495âChild and adolescent mental health system of care; 186 programs and services.â 187 (4)âThe array of services may include, but is not limited 188 to: 189 (p)âTrauma-informed services for children who have suffered 190 sexual exploitation as defined in s. 39.01(81)(g) s. 191 39.01(80)(g). 192 Section 6.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 193 934.255, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 194 934.255âSubpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.â 195 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 196 (c)ââSexual abuse of a childâ means a criminal offense 197 based on any conduct described in s. 39.01(81) s. 39.01(80). 198 Section 7.âSubsection (5) of section 960.065, Florida 199 Statutes, is amended to read: 200 960.065âEligibility for awards.â 201 (5)âA person is not ineligible for an award pursuant to 202 paragraph (2)(a), paragraph (2)(b), or paragraph (2)(c) if that 203 person is a victim of sexual exploitation of a child as defined 204 in s. 39.01(81)(g) s. 39.01(80)(g). 205 Section 8.âSubsection (24) of section 984.03, Florida 206 Statutes, is amended to read: 207 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 208 (24)ââNeglectâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01 s. 209 39.01(53). 210 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.